android/device/softwinner/wing-common/apkdata/txt2epub/hyphenDicts/hyph_en.dic
1vede
ve1det
1vedg
vedg3es
ve1di
v1edl
v1e2d1n
vee1ry
veg1
ve1g2a.
ve1g2as
ve1gr
vehe1
ve1h
2ve1j
v4e1la
ve2l2a.
3velato1ry
velato2r
vela1to
4vele
ve1len2
v1el1er
vel3ett2
v1elf
ve1lia
ve1lie
veli3er
ve1lig
ve1li1h
ve1lio
v1el1is
v3el3iz
1vel1la
vel3ler
vel1li
v1el1n
ve1lod
ve1lon
vel4o2p.
ve3lo2p2e.
vel3o2ped4
ve3lopes4
v1el1r
vel1t3er
ve1lu
v2e1ly
ve1m
1ve2m1b2
ven1ab
ve1nae
ve1nal
ve1nat
1ven1ca
v1ence
ve1ne
1ve2n2e.
ve2neg
ve2ne1z2
v1en1f
v3enlin
ven1l
v1en1m2
ven1n
ven3o2m.
veno2m
v3en3ousn
vens3en
ve2ns
1ven1sl
1vens1v
ve1n2u.
ve1nus
v1eny
ve1ol
ve1p
3verbia
ver1b
ver2d3al
ver1da
1v4e2r2e.
v2er1ea
v1erei
1verel
ver1e2m
3verene
3v4e2re2s.
v1eric
ver1ie
1ver3if
ver3ist
veris2
1ver1it
ve3r2i3te
ver1k
ver3m
verm2i2n3
ver2net
v1er2ns
ve3rona
3ver2sab
ve2rs
ver1sa
3versed
3verser
3vers1es
3versin
v2ert
ver1th
ver1u
v1er’
v1er'
4v2e2s.
v2e1sh
ve1sid
ve1sit
ve1sn
ve1so
ve1spo
ves1ta
1vest3e
ves1ti3a
ves3tie
1vest1m
ves1tr2
1ves2ts
v1es1ty
ve1ta
vet1er
vet1es
vet1et
vet3ier
ve1tiz
1vet1m
v2e1tr2
ve1u
ve1w
vi1ab
vi1ag
1vi1ah
vi1al
vi4all
vi1a2n
1vi1ana
vi1ar
viar3i2s
via1tr2
vi1at
vi1bu
vi1cho2
vi1cu
vid1ab
vi1dad
1vid2e.
1vi2d1ed
vi1del
2v1i1den
1vid1er
1vides
1vid1et
vid1i
v1ie1g
v1ie1l
v1iem
1vi1en
1v2i1era
1vi1et
viet1i
1viev
v1i1f
vi1ga
vi1ge
vi1gn
vig1os
1vik
vi1ki
vi1lah
vi1lan
vil3est
1vil1ia
v1ilis
1v4il1it
v1i1liz
vill4
1vil2l.
vil1li
v1ilm
v1il1r
vil1t
v1il1tr2
vi1me
3vime1te
v2imet
2vina
vi1nat
4vince
vin1d
vin2die
vine1g
vin1et
2v1in2g
1vini
vin1is
vin1it
vi1no
1v2i2o.
v2i1o1l
vi1on
v1ior
vior1i
vi1os1
v1i1ot
vi1ous
vi2pa
vi1pe
vi1ra
vir1eo
vir1g
vi1r2i.
vi3ridi
vi1ri1o
vi1ro
vi1sas
4visa1to
vi1sat
vis1it
visk1
1vi1s2o
vis2s1
v4i1t2a.
vi1ta
vita1b
vi1ti
1vi2tic
v4itis
3vi1ti2s.
vit1r2
vi1tu
vi1ut
1viv
viv1i4a
viv1id
vi1vo
1vix1
vi1y
viz1es
vi3zie2r.
viz1i
viz2ie
vi1zo
v1k
v1la
v1lov
v1ni
1v2o.
4v3ocably
vo1ca
voca1bl
vocal4l
vo1ce
1voe
void1e
vo2id
vois1
1voka
vok1er
vol1a
vol3an
1voli
vol3l2
vo1lo
1volt
volt1e
vo1me
vom1i
vor1ab
vo1rac
1vorc
1vore
vo1ree
vo3rie2s.
vor1il
vor1in
vor1it
1vorl
v1o1ro
vo2ry
1vos
vo1si
vot1al
vo1ta1r
2v1o1tee
vo2tel
v1o2ts
v1oua
vous2e
vow3e2ds
1vo2y
v1ro
vry1
v1se
v1ski1
v1so
1v2u.
1vua
1vu1d
vul1pi
1vur
vu1ra
1vus
2v1v2
v3vi
vvi1er
v1w
v2y
vy1a
vy1s
wa1ba
2wac
wa1co
wa1dis
wa1fe
wa1ger
wag1o
wa1hi
1wa1ia
wai2t
wait3er
wait1r2
1waka
wak1an
wal1id
wall3er
wall3in2
1walp
wamp1i
wa1nab
w1anc
wan1de
wa1nee
wa1nis
wan3kel
wa2nk
wank3e2rs
wank3ies
wan3na
want3et
wa2nt
1wao
w1aoc
wa1pi
w1ar2c
war3den
ward3er
ward3et
w2are
war1ea
warf1i
war1i
warm1i
war3thy
wa1sa
wa1se
wash1a
was1t1r2
wa1ta
wa1te
wa1tha
wa3tl
w2at2ty
wa2tt2
1wav
wave1l
wa3ver
wav1i
wavi1e
1wax1
wa1z
w1b
wball3i
wbone2
wbones3
w1c
w2chi
wcit1
wcom3be
w1co2mb
w1da
w1dee
w1den
wd1es
wdi1er
wd1ing
w1dis
w1d2j
w1do
w1dr
w1driv4
w1du
w1dy1i
weap1
wea3rie
wea3ril
wea3rin2e
wea3ris
wea1ry
wea1s
weat1e
wea2t
weath1
weat1i
weav3er
1web
we1be
we1den
we2di
we2d2n
weens3ies
wee2ns
ween1si
wee1ny
we1est4
weet1e
wee1v
weez2
wee3z1er
we1i1da
weil2
wei1le
w1e2l.
weld3e2n
wel1et
wel1i
wel2is
wel1ki
wel2l
w4ell3an
wel1la
wel3le2rs
well3est
wel1l3et
wel1l3ia
wel1l3ie
2wem1
we1na
wen3del
wen1th
we2nt
w1er
wer1et4
wern1
wes3e
wes1k
we1so
west1e
wes3teri
west3i
w4est1o
we1tas
we1to
wet1te
wett2
w1ev1
wey1v
w1f
w1g
wh2
w2hai
whal3er
w1haw
whee1d
whe1la
where1up3
whi2
whir3ri
whi2r2r
who2r
1w2i.
1w2i1a
wi2c
wick1e
wi2ck
wid3e2n.
wid1er
wid3est
wid1g
w2ie
w3i2e.
wi2es
wi2et
wif1i
wift1e2
wig1i
wig1l
wik1
wi2le
wil1ie
wi1lig
wi1lil
wil1in
will3in2
wi2m1b
wind3e
wind3ie
win3dli
win2dr
wing3er
wing1l
win3kel
wi2nk
win1os
wi2n1t
wi2p
wip1er
wir1i
wir2l
wirl3in
wi2s
w2i2s.
1w2ise
wis1pi
wis2t
wis1t1i
with1a
with3es
wit1l
2wix1
wiz1
w2j
w2ke
wk1er
wk1i
w1la
wla1b
wland3e2rs
wl1d
wl1edg
w1leg
wl1er
wl1e2t.
wl1e2ts
w1lic
w3lie2s.
w1lif
w1line
wli1n2ess4
wl1ing
wl1i2ns
wl1is
w1liv
wl1l
w1loc
wl1ow
w1m
wmo1bi4
w1mob
wn1ab2
wn1er
w1nes
w2n1est
wn1eye
wni1er
wn1ig
wn1is
wn1n
wn1o
wn1spo
w2ns
wn1swi
wnsw2
w2n1t
w1n1ya
1woc
wo1fe
wo3fu
2wok
wolv4
1wom1
won1d
woof3er
woo2f
woo2l
wool1i
wooli3es
woo1z
woozi1
wo1pe
word1i
worm1i
w2orm
w2o1sc
wo1so
w1p
w3ped
w1q
wretch3
wri2
wri3er
wring3er
wri1t1a2
writ3er
wron1g3er
wron2g
wrong3es
2wry1
ws1a
w1s2erv
w1sh
w1sid
ws1ies
w1sill
ws1i1l2y
ws3ines2s.
wsi1n2ess
w2s1ing
ws2k
ws1m
w1so
wsol1
ws1s
w1st
ws1w2
w1te
w1the
w1ti
w1to
wtoni1
1wul
wum1pe
wu2s
w1v
w1w
wy2
wy1c1l
wy1c
w1ye
2wyl
wy3le2n
wy3m
w1z
wzi1n
x1
xac1e
xact1a
xa2ct
xac2te
x2a3go2n.
x2a3go2ns
xa1gr
xalt1e
xam1en
xam3e1te
xam1i
xam4i1na
xan1d
x2a1p
xar1
xas1
xche1
xci2
xe1b
xe1cr2
xec3u1to
x2ed
xe1g
x2el
xe1la
xe1ma
xer2i
xero4g
xe1u
xhil1
xi1al
xi1a2n
xi1b
xi1cil
xi1co
xi1da
xi1di
xi2d1in
xie1l
xi1er
xi1fi
xi1ge
x2ii2
xi1la
xil1i
xil1ia1
xi1m
x2ime
xim3ise
xi1mis
x3in
xi1om
xis2t1i
xi1ti
x2i1w
x3les
x2ob
xobi1ol3
xo1bi
x2o1c
xo1d
x2og1a1
xoge1
xo1la
xoma2
xon1e
xo1ni
xo1ny
xo1p
xo1ra1
xor1d
xordi3
xo1ri
x2o1s
x2ote
xo1t1er
x2o1th
xot1i
xo1t2is
xo1tr2
xpand3e
xpatri4
x1pa1tr2
x3pe
xpec1to3
xpe2ct
x2pe1d2
xpel3l4i
xpo1n
xport3e
xpos1i1to4
xqui1
xta1s
xtempori3za
x1temp
xtem1po
xtempo1ri
xten3det
x1tend
x2th
xt1l
xtol3l4i
xtract3a
xtr2
xtra2ct
xtual4
xtu1a
xtualiz3es
xtual1iz
xtur1a
xu1a
xu1b
xud1i
xu1r
x2y
xy1a
x3ye
x3y3g
x3y1h
xy1l
xy1mo1
x3ys
2y.
1y2a.
y1ab
yac2
yacety3
yach2e
ya1ci
ya2f
y1a2g2e.
y1ag1er
y1agi
ya1ha
ya1ho
y1al
yall1e
yal1t
ya1mad
yanc3es
y3and
yan3e2t.
ya1ni
ya1nos
ya1n1ot
1yaq
ya1qu
1yar
yar2b
yar2mo
yasa1
1yase
yas1t
yat1i
yawn1i
yaw1p1
ya1za
yazz1
y1b
ybar2
y2b1b
y3be
y3bi
y3bo
ybus1
y1c
ycae1
y1ca
yc1am
yca1m1i
y3cat
yce1l
y3ce1m
y1ce1p
ycephal3i
ycephal2
yc1er1
y3ceu
ych2e
y2che2d.
y2chin
y1cho1k2
y2c2hs
ycla1m
y1cl
y3co
ycol3o1gie
yco1p
y2c1t
y1da
y1der
y1dew
y1di
y1di2v
ydi1v3er
y1do
y1dr
1yea
ye1dr
y1ee
ye1gl
1ye1h
yehov1
ye1i
y1e2j
ye1la
ye1le
yeli3t
yell1i
ye1lo
ye1ma
ye1me
yem1i
ye1na
ye1ni
yeo1m
ye1op
ye1pi
1ye1q
y1er
y2er1f
y2ert
ye1ser
yes2e
yes3es
y2e1sh
ye1si
ye1so
yes3sed
y2ess
yes1te
ye1te
yethe1
yeth1yl3
ye1to
y1eu
ye1un
yeur1i
1ye2v.
ye1v1k
ye1wa
ye1wi
y1ey
ye1z
y1f
yfarm1
y1fa
yfin1
y1gag
yg1a1m
yg1el
ygen1
y1gi
y1gl
yg1n
y1go
y2g1o1n2a
y1gr
yg4ra
y4g3raphe2
y1gu
yg1y
y1h
y1i
y2ie
yi1er
yi1es
y2ik
yi1ka
yi1o1l
yiolog2
yk1er
y1ku
y1la
1yl1c
y1lee
yle2n
ylend1
2yli
ylin1d
yl3inde
y3lin1dr
yl1is4h
yl3i2s4t.
y3lis1ti
ylistical4
ylis3tic
ylisti1ca
yl3is2ts
yl1iz
yl1k
yll2
ylla3bl
yl1la
yl1le
yl1li
y1lo
ylo3ric
ylot1
yl1t
y1lu
yl1v
ylves1
y1l1w
y1ly
2y2m.
y3ma
yman1d
ymas1
3yma2t2h.
yma3thy
y2m1b
ymbe3
ymbol3ism
ym1bo
y1mena
ymen3al
y1me2ns
yme1st
2ymi
ym1i1ca
ym1i2cs
y1mi1d2
y1mie
ym1ing
ym1it
ym1iu
y1mo
ympa1t
ym3pa
ymph3al
ym1pi
2y2ms
y1mu
y1na
yn1ag
ynal3
yn1ap
y3nar
yn1da
yn1di
yn1erg
yn1et
2ynge
yn1gi
yn1in
y2n1k
y2nn
yn1ne2t3
yn1od
yn1on1
yn1op1
y1not
y3no1v
y1noz
y2ns2
y2n1t
y1nu
1y1ny
yo1d
y1of
yo1g
yogen1
yog2i
yo1in
yoi3t
1yok
yo1kel
yo2la
yo2li
y1olo
y3o1m
yom4i
yon1de
y1one
yo1net
yo2nk2
yon1ke
yo2n2s
y1o1p2
yor1a
yo1se
yosem1
yo1sh
yo1sta
y1ot
yot1i
1y2oty
young3e
youn4g
1y2p.
y1pa
y1peg
yper1
y2pes
yph1i
yphi1l
y3phoni
y2ph3o1no
yph3o1ny
y1phu
yp1i
y1pl
y1po
ypo1a
ypo2te
y1pr
yp1sy
y2ps
ypt1a
y2pt
y1pu
yra1c
y1rak
yr3annie
yran1ni
yr3an3ny
y1ra2nt
yr1c2a1
y1rea
yre1an
y3re1nea
y1ret
yre1th
y1rex1
y1rh
yr3ia
y1rill
yr1iz
yr1m
y1ro
yrole1
yro3le1a
yrol3ys
yro1p
y2ro1st
yr1t
yr1up
y1ry
y1sac
ys1a1l
ys2a2nt
ys1ar
y3sc
ys2e
y1sea
y1sed
y1sem
y1ser
y1s1es
y1sh
ys1ic
y2s1ing
y1s3io
y1si1p
ys1k
y1sli
ys1lo
ys1ma
ys1mi
ys1o1l
ys1om
y1so2n.
ys1or
y1s1os
ys4pho1
ysph2
ys1pl
y1sq
1ys1si
ys2tag
ys1tal
ys1tat
ystem3i
ys1t2it
ysto3le
ys1tra
ystr2
ystro3p
y2s1t1w2
y1sty1
ysva1
ys1v
y1sw2
y1syl
y1ta
y1tec
ytell1
y3te3ria
y1tha
y2th4e.
yth3i3a2n
yth3ologi1ca
ytho1log1ic
y3thol3o1gie
y3thol1o1gis
ytho1m
yt1ic
yt1in
y1tiz
y1tl
y1to
yto1c
yto1m
y1tr2
yt1t2
y1tu
yu1a
yu1b
yu1g
yu1ko
yu2l
yu1mi
yu1ni
yure1
yu1ri
y1us
y1va
y1w
ywrit1
ywri2
yx2is
yx1
y1ya
yz1ab
yz1er
yz1i
2z.
za1ba
z2a1b2a.
za1be
za1be1e
zabe3l
za1dar
zaf1t
za1ha
zahar1
za1id
za1la
za1le
za1l1i
za1lm
zalm3o2n.
zal1mo
zal1mon
2z1a1ma
zambi3a2n
zam1bi
za2mb
zam1bi2a
zan3dee
za1ni
zani3er
1zano
zan3ti
za2nt
za1ny
za1pa
za1pha
za1rae
zar2al
zar2d
zard3ou
zar1do
za3re
z1aren
zar1is
z1a1rit
z1arm
1zaro
zar1ot
za1rov
za2r2r
1zar2t
z1a1ru
1zas
za1t
za2te
1za2tl
za1vi
za1y
za1ze
z1azo
zazz1
z1b
z1c
zea1la
z1ean
1zeb
ze1ben
ze1bi1
ze1bus
zech1a
ze1da
1ze1de
ze1dr
1zee
1zeg
ze1go
zeg1r
1zei
ze1la
ze1let
ze1ma
zema2t
ze1me
zemi1
ze1na
zena3g
ze1nif
1zen1l
zen1n
ze1no
1zen1r
z1e2nt
ze1o1
ze2p
zeph1a
ze3phi
zer1a
z2er1b
ze1ria
zeri3as2
zer3it
1zer1l
ze1ro
zest1i
ze1ta
zet2l
3zet2t2e.
zett2
3zet2t3ed
z3et1tee
3zettes
1zet1ti
zet2t3in
ze1ve
ze1w
zey1
z1ezo
z1ga
zhar1
zhei1
zheim2
zhik1
zh1y
z1i2a.
1zic
zi1ch
zi1do
1zied
zieg1
z2ier2a
1zi2er1i
1zie2rs
1zii2
1zi2l.
zi1la
1zili
zi1ma
zi2m3b
zi1mu
zi1na
zing3e2rs
zi2ni
zi1o
z2ir
zi1ra
1zis
zis1t
z1i2t2e.
1z2iu
ziv1
1z1j
z1ki
z1kr
z1ku
1zky
1z2l
2z2l.
zle1l
zle1m
zlo1
z1m
zmav1
zn1in
zo1an
zo1ar
zo1at
zo1bel
zo1di
zo1el
zogu1
zo1in
zo1k
zo1la
1zom
zom1a
1zon
zo1nan
zo1nat
zo1n1ic
zo1no
1zoo
zo1o1i
zoo3k
zo3ol1o1gis
zo3ol1o1gy
zoom1i
zo1on
zoo1p
zo1p
zor3am1i
zore1a
zor1it
zo1ro
zo1si
zo1ti
z1p
z2pi
z1q
z1rac
z1rai
z1re
z1r2o.
z1ron1
z1sa
zsch3er
zsch2
z1st
z1te2
zte1c1a
z1th
z1to
1zu
zu1e1
zu1gr
zu1ni
zu1ric
zur1i1e
zurl1
zu1zi
z1v
zwill1
z1wo
zy2d
1zy1i
zy1l
z1za
z1zen
zzi2a
z1zi1ah
z1ziel1
zzi1er
z1z2ir
z1zo
’1sh
’west2
'1sh
'west2
2n't
2n’t
2a’2
2b’2
2c’2
2d’2
2e’2
2f’2
2g’2
2h’2
2i’2
2j’2
2k’2
2l’2
2m’2
2n’2
2o’2
2p’2
2q’2
2r’2
2s’2
2t’2
2u’2
2v’2
2w’2
2x’2
2y’2
2z’2
2a'2
2b'2
2c'2
2d'2
2e'2
2f'2
2g'2
2h'2
2i'2
2j'2
2k'2
2l'2
2m'2
2n'2
2o'2
2p'2
2q'2
2r'2
2s'2
2t'2
2u'2
2v'2
2w'2
2x'2
2y'2
2z'2
2’a2
2’b2
2’c2
2’d2
2’e2
2’f2
2’g2
2’h2
2’i2
2’j2
2’k2
2’l2
2’m2
2’n2
2’o2
2’p2
2’q2
2’r2
2’s2
2’t2
2’u2
2’v2
2’w2
2’x2
2’y2
2’z2
2'a2
2'b2
2'c2
2'd2
2'e2
2'f2
2'g2
2'h2
2'i2
2'j2
2'k2
2'l2
2'm2
2'n2
2'o2
2'p2
2'q2
2'r2
2's2
2't2
2'u2
2'v2
2'w2
2'x2
2'y2
2'z2
